Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4113
DNA samples; additional offenses; Nebraska State Patrol; duties.

The Nebraska State Patrol may recommend to the Legislature that the Legislature enact legislation for the inclusion of additional offenses for which DNA samples shall be collected and otherwise subjected to the DNA Identification Information Act. In determining whether to recommend additional offenses, the Nebraska State Patrol shall consider those offenses for which DNA testing will have a substantial impact on the detection and identification of sexual offenders and violent offenders.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 385, § 12.